Utah statutes.
26-2-15.   Petition for establishment of unregistered birth or death --
Court procedure.
(1)  A person holding a direct, tangible, and legitimate interest as described
in Subsection 26-2-22(2)(a) or (b) may petition for a court order establishing
the fact, time, and place of a birth or death that is not registered or for
which a certified copy of the registered birth or death certificate is not
obtainable.  The person shall verify the petition and file it in the Utah
district court for the county where:
(a)  the birth or death is alleged to have occurred;
(b)  the person resides whose birth is to be established; or
(c)  the decedent named in the petition resided at the date of death.
(2)  In order for the court to have jurisdiction, the petition shall:
(a)  allege the date, time, and place of the birth or death; and
(b)  state either that no certificate of birth or death has been registered or
that a copy  of the registered certificate cannot be obtained.
(3)  The court shall set a hearing for five to 10 days after the filing of the
petition.
(4) (a)  If the time and place of birth or death are in question, the court
shall hear available evidence and determine the time and place of the birth or
death.
(b)  If the time and place of birth or death are not in question, the court
shall determine the time and place of birth or death to be those alleged in
the petition.
(5)  A court order under this section shall be made on a form prescribed and
furnished by the department and is effective upon the filing of a certified
copy of the order with the state registrar.
(6) (a)  For purposes of this section, the birth certificate of an adopted
alien child, as defined in Section 78B-6-108, is considered to be unobtainable
if the child was born in a country that is not recognized by department rule
as having an established vital records registration system.
(b)  If the adopted child was born in a country recognized by department rule,
but a person described in Subsection (1) is unable to obtain a certified copy
of the birth certificate, the state registrar shall authorize the preparation
of a birth certificate if he receives a written statement signed by the
registrar of the child's birth country stating a certified copy of the birth
certificate is not available.
